lexc/adj/enhuadjmnevek.lexc
LEXICON Poss3
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam3;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4a§m   Fam3;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam3;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4a§d   Fam3;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam3;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam3;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam3;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4a§t§OEOE§k   Fam3;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam3;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam3;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam3;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam3;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam3;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam3;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam3;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam3;
 
LEXICON Possm3
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam3;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4a§m   Fam3;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam3;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4a§d   Fam3;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam3;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam3;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam3;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4a§t§OEOE§k   Fam3;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam3;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam3;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam3;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam3;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam3;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam3;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam3;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famm3;
LEXICON Plur3
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen3;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Gen3;
                            Gen3;
LEXICON Plurm3
!+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen3;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Gen3;
                            Gen31;
        
LEXICON Fam3
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen3;
                       Gen3;
LEXICON Famm3
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen3;
                       Gen31;

LEXICON Gen3
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case3;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case3;
                       Case3;
 
LEXICON Gen31
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case3;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case3;
                       Case31;

LEXICON Case3
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON Case31
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^at       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
!+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
							Ik;

! büdös, büdösek
LEXICON AddAdjoe
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocaseoe;

Lexicon Tocaseoe
[stem]+Adj:0     Poss;
[stem]+Adj:0     Pluroe;
[stem]+Adj:0     Fam;

LEXICON Pluroe
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11e§k    Gen;
                            Gen;
        

Lexicon AddIlyen
[stem]+Adj:0 IlyenCase;

LEXICON IlyenCase
+Acc:^+cAcc^§AA§t       #;  ! ilyet olyat

! AddIlyen helyett beépítve
LEXICON AddAdjI
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  TocaseI;

Lexicon TocaseI
[stem]+Adj:0     PossI;
[stem]+Adj:0     PlurI;
[stem]+Adj:0     Fam;

LEXICON PossI
+Acc:^+cAcc^§AA§t       #;  ! ilyet olyat
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4a§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4a§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4a§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;
LEXICON PlurI
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoeadjoe§k    Gen; !iek, iak
                            Gen;

!at, am és ot om is
LEXICON AddAdjot
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocaseot;


Lexicon Tocaseot
[stem]+Adj:0     Possot;
[stem]+Adj:0     Plurot;
[stem]+Adj:0     Famot;

LEXICON Possot
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoe§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Famot;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4a§m   Famot;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Famot;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4a§d   Famot;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famot;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famot;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famot;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4a§t§OEOE§k   Famot;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famot;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famot;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famot;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famot;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famot;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famot;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famot;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famot1;
LEXICON Plurot
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Genot;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Genot;
                            Genot1;
        
LEXICON Famot
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genot;
                       Genot;

LEXICON Famot1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genot;
                       Genot1;

LEXICON Genot
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseot;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseot;
                       Caseot;

LEXICON Adj2num
kilós AddAdjI;
osztályos AddAdjI;
párevezős AddAdjoe;
éves AddAdjI;
LEXICON Adj
accesses AddAdjI;
algopyrines AddAdjI;
amorf AddAdjot;
analóg AddAdjot;
andersenes AddAdjI;
angolvörös AddAdjoe;
artneres AddAdjI;
balleneggeres AddAdjI;
barnásvörös AddAdjoe;
bauxitvörös AddAdjoe;
bayeres AddAdjI;
beksicses AddAdjI;
beniczes AddAdjI;
bergeres AddAdjI;
bezerédjes AddAdjI;
bikaerős AddAdjoe;
bitteres AddAdjI;
bivalyerős AddAdjoe;
boldog AddAdjot;
bordóvörös AddAdjoe;
borgőzös AddAdjoe;
borostyánkőis AddAdjI;
borvörös AddAdjoe;
briliáns AddAdjot;
brisitses AddAdjI;
bronzvörös AddAdjoe;
buzérvörös AddAdjoe;
bánhegyis AddAdjI;
bíborvörös AddAdjoe;
bögyös AddAdjoe;
bördös AddAdjoe;
büdös AddAdjoe;
bütykös AddAdjoe;
bősz AddAdjI;
bűnös AddAdjoe;
bűvös AddAdjoe;
churchilles AddAdjI;
cifraszűrös AddAdjoe;
cinóbervörös AddAdjoe;
csebiseves AddAdjI;
csippékes AddAdjI;
csökönyös AddAdjoe;
csúf AddAdjot;
czeizinges AddAdjI;
czipszeres AddAdjI;
céklavörös AddAdjoe;
decens AddAdjI;
demars AddAdjot;
dengles AddAdjI;
dezsős AddAdjI;
didergős AddAdjoe;
diszperz AddAdjI;
druckeres AddAdjI;
dölyfös AddAdjoe;
dötschös AddAdjI;
dühös AddAdjoe;
együdös AddAdjI;
elegáns AddAdjI;
elöltesztelős AddAdjoe;
emlős AddAdjoe;
engerthes AddAdjI;
erdős AddAdjoe;
erkölcsös AddAdjoe;
erős AddAdjoe;
erőssös AddAdjoe;
esküttös AddAdjI;
eszelős AddAdjoe;
esős AddAdjoe;
ezüstös AddAdjoe;
eöttevényis AddAdjI;
feikses AddAdjI;
felsős AddAdjoe;
fenicheles AddAdjI;
feyéres AddAdjI;
fittleres AddAdjI;
forsteres AddAdjI;
frommeres AddAdjI;
félötös AddAdjoe;
fölös AddAdjoe;
füleppes AddAdjI;
fürtös AddAdjoe;
füstös AddAdjoe;
geigeres AddAdjI;
gerles AddAdjI;
gidres-gödrös AddAdjoe;
giessweines AddAdjI;
gnädiges AddAdjI;
grabneres AddAdjI;
gritsches AddAdjI;
gránátvörös AddAdjoe;
gumis AddAdjI;
gyöpös AddAdjoe;
gábrieles AddAdjI;
gólerős AddAdjoe;
göcsörtös AddAdjoe;
gödrös AddAdjoe;
göndöcsös AddAdjI;
görcsös AddAdjoe;
görögös AddAdjoe;
göröngyös AddAdjoe;
göthös AddAdjoe;
gümős AddAdjoe;
gőgös AddAdjoe;
gőzös AddAdjoe;
halacskás AddAdjI;
harmados AddAdjI;
hegeles AddAdjI;
helles AddAdjI;
herczés AddAdjI;
hetvenszeres AddAdjI;
hideglelős AddAdjoe;
hofrichteres AddAdjI;
huncut AddAdjot; !at, am és ot om is
hímnős AddAdjoe;
hölblinges AddAdjI;
idős AddAdjoe;
inkompetens AddAdjI;
jajvörös AddAdjoe;
jedlikes AddAdjI;
jogerős AddAdjoe;
karmazsinvörös AddAdjoe;
karpés AddAdjI;
kernes AddAdjI;
kiszelyes AddAdjI;
kohneres AddAdjI;
kottaneres AddAdjI;
kugleres AddAdjI;
kárminvörös AddAdjoe;
köbös AddAdjoe;
köpcös AddAdjoe;
körössényis AddAdjI;
közömbös AddAdjoe;
közös AddAdjoe;
latens AddAdjI;
levegős AddAdjoe;
lidles AddAdjI;
lilásvörös AddAdjoe;
lotteres AddAdjI;
lőerős AddAdjoe;
majoráns AddAdjI;
medvigyes AddAdjI;
meggyvörös AddAdjoe;
mikecses AddAdjI;
moravekes AddAdjI;
mélyvörös AddAdjoe;
nagymedvés AddAdjI;
narancsvörös AddAdjoe;
nyavalyatörős AddAdjoe;
nyireős AddAdjI;
nyűgös AddAdjoe;
olaj AddAdjot;
pantocsekes AddAdjI;
paprikavörös AddAdjoe;
pertikes AddAdjI;
perzsavörös AddAdjoe;
pilleres AddAdjI;
pornográf AddAdjot;
precíz AddAdjI;
próbaidős AddAdjoe;
párevezős AddAdjoe;
péchis AddAdjI;
redős AddAdjoe;
reichles AddAdjI;
rhoreres AddAdjI;
rooseveltes AddAdjI;
rubintvörös AddAdjoe;
rákvörös AddAdjoe;
részmunkaidős AddAdjoe;
rókavörös AddAdjoe;
rút AddAdjI;
scheuthaueres AddAdjI;
schoberes AddAdjI;
schwimmeres AddAdjI;
semayeres AddAdjI;
sietős AddAdjoe;
sollneres AddAdjI;
stemmeres AddAdjI;
sylvesteres AddAdjI;
szamizdat AddAdjot;
szellős AddAdjoe;
szijjes AddAdjI;
szégyenlős AddAdjoe;
szüdis AddAdjI;
szűkös AddAdjoe;
sömörös AddAdjoe;
sürgős AddAdjoe;
tehetős AddAdjoe;
tenczeres AddAdjI;
termős AddAdjoe;
tetszetős AddAdjoe;
tokajis AddAdjI;
tyroleres AddAdjI;
téglavörös AddAdjoe;
többszörös AddAdjoe;
törökös AddAdjoe;
veliches AddAdjI;
velős AddAdjoe;
vinkleres AddAdjI;
vizenyős AddAdjoe;
vörös AddAdjoe;
waldsteines AddAdjI;
weltzles AddAdjI;
windisches AddAdjI;
zemlényis AddAdjI;
zöldmezős AddAdjoe;
égővörös AddAdjoe;
élénkvörös AddAdjoe;
érdújhelyis AddAdjI;
érzelgős AddAdjoe;
önerős AddAdjoe;
öntöltős AddAdjoe;
ördöngös AddAdjoe;
örökös AddAdjoe;
üdvös AddAdjoe;
üszögös AddAdjoe;
